Utah statutes.
24-1-11.   Attorneys' fees and costs.
In any proceeding to forfeit seized property under this chapter, the court
shall award a prevailing party reasonable attorneys' fees and other costs of
litigation reasonably incurred by the owner.  An owner who prevails only in
part is entitled to recover reasonable attorneys' fees and reasonable costs of
suit related to those issues on which he prevailed.
